



Immedia PLC - Where Brands Shake Hands With Fans






























 


Tech
Depth
New
PLC
Connect
 





Tech
Depth
New
PLC
Connect
 





 






 






Imagine a channel available to every member of your workforce, exciting, interactive, entertaining and worthy. Imagine your working family waking up to your live breakfast show talking about the things happening in your world. Or alternatively, imagine a channel that bonds your customers with downloadable music, brand conversation, product news and rewards.
Then imagine the data, we’ve got that too.
Your culture is relevant in your world, around the clock. Turn your channel into a great share, shake hands, create fans anytime, anywhere, any place.










 


Back







Hip tunes


 




00:00
/
00:00






Back







BMW Magic


 




00:00
/
00:00








BMW Group UK desire to provide an industry benchmark in retail customer experience and following exceptional responses to trials held in a small number of prestigious showrooms in 2014, Immedia Group plc has been appointed as the official provider of digital music channels for BMW and Mini dealer showrooms across the UK and Ireland.
The music selection for each channel is designed to encapsulate the spirit of both the BMW and Mini brands. Immedia has developed a music strategy with heightened brand symphony, creating a closer demographic alignment between the music and their customers.
Historically, franchisees have been tasked with creating their own music playlists for showrooms, iPods, local radio stations, CDs and in some cases, no music at all. In every case providing the right audio ambience for the retail space has proven to be difficult.
Now, franchisees can order one or both of the official digital music channels relevant to each brand. Each channel is carefully mastered with hundreds of ‘brand tracks’ updated monthly.
“Music and first class sound reproduction can be a huge enhancement to the overall driving experience, and we aim to remind customers of this in the retail environment” – Immedia.










 






 









A studio in its own world, in 1999. The launch of the world’s first fully fledged radio station on the internet ‘Storm Live’ where listeners could interact with celeb presenters including model Jo Guest, pop star Kim Appleby and Joe Absolom of Eastenders. Other wacky ‘EJ’s’ with names like ‘hard driver’ filled the schedule 24 hrs a day.
Storm Live was the brain child of Bruno Brookes. He hired top producer Ric Blaxill whom revitalised Top of the Pops, created CDUK with Ant and Dec and made a TV star out of Ian Wright . There were actually 2 studios, one in Newbury and a second in New Bond Street London, where pop star guests were easier to engage. Storm Live soon white labelled its service to ‘ISP’s including Freeserve and major on line sites including The Sun (Current Bun) and Pricerunner.com.
The studios, were full of web cams which allowed users to see every move. Fans could click presenter pics and get a mention to camera!
“It was a bit like seeing the first images from a radio astronaught saying hello to you by name” said Brookes.
The station and its pop up audiovisual player soon attracted audiences from around the globe, including thousands of developers notably from Ebay and lots of search engines. The project inspired further launches of interactive services in retail including Impulse Live, specific to 4000 convenience stores across the UK, in partnership with the Sun, News of the World, Spar, Londis, Texaco and more.










 


Back




 




Back




 









The power of persuasion in the simplest way. Following empirical research during live trials, RadioVision was launched in 2005 exclusively for Lloyds Banking Group and the majority of its retail banks across the UK. RadioVision is unique, where presenters are able to trigger specific visuals or video relevant to product and services. This creates a conversational approach around the facts, as apposed to a repetitive voice track.
The channel also provides music to reflect demographic and day part, along with news, sport, weather, staff recognition and other relevant information.










 






 


Check this out


 




00:00
/
00:00








GAME stores break the sound barrier for GTA V launch.
As the launch of GTA V was poised for release and become the hottest game on the planet, Immedia were planning a GTA V radio takeover across 300 stores for the UK’s leading independent games retailer GAME.
As GTA fans and novices alike entered a GAME store, they were immediately propelled into the world of Los Santos, an in-store atmosphere that was pure West Coast and uniquely Grand Theft Auto. The campaign was so successful that the schedule was extended to include weekdays to allow for staff and customers to hear the radio shows outside of the weekend timetable.
Hear ‘Game Live’ from Immedia in your GAME store.










 


Back




 







Back




 






There are millions of Apps available for download. Some have changed our world, others sit in the ether, ideas with no purpose – or have we all missed something? 
If we only had the time to explore all of these gizmos available to us, maybe there is something just a bit special we could download as a ‘must have’ – something to tune our mobile experience?
We build our Apps for purpose. We have made it easier for brands and businesses to communicate with people who are important, helping to extend a ‘hard to reach’ community. With exciting, relevant content, explore your opportunity to share and enjoy entertainment, say something special and create that closer connection.










 













Our imagination, passion, expertise and commitment is best exampled with Topshop, probably the most successful marriage between music and fashion retail in the world.
Immedia has supplied over 15 years of expert ‘on brand’ music profiling, with over 11,000 updates delivered per year, consisting of 12,000 bespoke pre-release tracks.
Then there is 120+ successful AV installations including all flagship stores, all 100% on time.










 


Back




 




Back




 






Creating Mind Maps around ideas and concepts is no new idea, but for us it is imperative. It’s all very well being asked to come up with strategy for a successful digital communication channel, but the big question is – what are the key benefits? How can they be measured ? What’s the upside?
Every business has an audience. Do you want to improve your relationship with your audience outside of the usual comms?
Whatever we create it needs to be unique, something that stands out. Your channel will drive ‘talkability’ and ‘social amplification’. It will emotionally influence, add depth and maintain a consistent cultural connection. It will feature a plethora of ideas to drive compelling content and deliver consistent surprise and delight. It should reinforce trust and values, the business has ears as well as a voice, and delivers on a promise.
Whether you are a consumer brand with fans around the globe, or a business with a giant workforce on the move, we want to work with you to create that closer connection with the people in your world.
“Music is a moral law. It gives soul to the universe, wings to the mind, flight to the imagination, and charm and gaiety to life and to everything” – Plato
 










 






 


Listen to the news report


 




00:00
/
00:00








The following audio was taken from a BBC TV ‘Tomorrow’s World’ programme in 1973.
UBN broadcasts were from the United Biscuits factory in Osterley to United Biscuits factories in London, Manchester and Glasgow 24 hours a day. It was the training ground for many of the UK’s best known radio presenters including Dale Winton.
Following the implementation of their own radio station annual staff turnover reduced from 80% to 28%. The channel created content as a result of research on the workforce. Other than music, presenters created commercials to influence workers behaviour, with topics around hygiene, safety, social. 
The channel helped to establish ‘one community’ across factories across the UK. Hear the story, including staff feedback.










 






 


Salon Sound live


 




00:00
/
00:00








REGISTER for SALON SOUND
Salons that are serious about ultimate customer service subscribe to the cool couture music channel ‘Salon Sound’. The mismanagement of music in a hair salon is one of the biggest issues in the business.
The cool couture music channel (Salon Sound) was created in collaboration with one of the industry’s leading global product manufacturers. This enabled Immedia to work with in-depth consumer insights, often used when creating new product innovations. Music is critical to the high end salon business, not unlike the fashion business. Glamour is ‘multi sensory’ and the right music at the right time is imperative.
Salon Sound delivers a highly specific music library compiled by experts, a combination of luxury sounds and expensive production, cool and appropriate and sometimes fun. Effectively, we have created an ever increasing library of  ‘sound images oozing in style’, whatever the trend, from celebrated artists across a range of music genres.
A trip to the salon for a woman has to be an inspirational and invigorating experience. A couple of enjoyable hours in a fantastic hair and beauty salon can build new confidence and enhanced style.
 
 










 






 






 









 






 









For the last 15 years, we have worked closely with retail to connect and entertain its shoppers and workforce with relevant music, information, real time interaction and colleague recognition. Last year alone, we delivered over 10 million hours of streamed content to thousands of retail stores. Now, it’s all got a bit more exciting. Your music and entertainment channels are not just in-store, but out of store, direct to mobile and any device connected to the web.
Expand your reach, promote your culture, share the vibes, start the conversation.
Shake hands, create fans, anytime, anywhere, any place.










 






 






So what about the next 10 years?
As modern technologies connect billions of humans at the speed of a meteorite, the window to the world has revealed the absolute realities of the planet in which we live, for the good and bad.
Almost every piece of the internet’s content sits in your pocket, useful if you need to know something. But is the stark commercialism of this technological phenomenon abusing its power over people, we wonder how long this “push and pull” relationship will last.
Strong indications of future trends suggests that the world is turning faster than we thought. People will prioritise core values around their family as the generations merge with the elderly feeling younger, fitter and healthier. There will be new communities for the elderly and the new beauty is to share and care for those less fortunate, give up on the greed, eat fresh, protest against waste and support the working class hero.
We will seek self sufficiency and an inner calm, with mobility we will work no more than 15 hrs a week in an office. There will be a new movement of urban nomads.         We will want to feel safe and rely on new technology to make trusted decisions, morph traditional with technologies, only responding to relevant and personalised marketing. We will become advocates and have the power to turn off blatant ad bombs.
Thousands of new age communities will evolve wholly dependent on core values, modern culture and varied interests. Digital media’s will be specifically controlled by those communities.
From the tiniest communities to brand giants, people will be looking for that ‘emotional and honest connection’, interacting with completely relevant information, at the right time, in any place, and powered by one simple force – the voice.
Bruno Brookes










 






 






Tom gained his Masters Degree in Mathematics from the University of Bristol focussing on statistical modelling and probability theory. This analytical and creative thinker combines his broad interests in music with the arts and sciences. Tom returned from Germany in 2014 where he was a studio manager at a radio station in Berlin and went onto become a writer for Crack Magazine.net amongst others. Tom is also trained as a ‘silver service waiter’ – So we get iced coffee’s now Tom has arrived!










 






 









We all know that IKEA stores are vast in size with an average of 28,000 square metres of retail space. There are on average 500 co-workers in each IKEA store with a big job to do across the 24 hrs of the day. Outside of normal retail hours, much is done through the night to restock the stores.
IKEA Live is a channel featuring specific marketing content tailored to customers during the day with other communications relevant to the workforce through the night. Co-workers can interact with a live presenter, choose songs with ‘shout outs’ to all stores across UK and Ireland. On average the night time shows would generate 600 requests a week from 17 locations.










 













Superdrug Live has been a fantastic success!
The channel is delivered live into the heart of over 800 Superdrug store across the UK. The content is designed to get to the core of Superdrug’s younger customers, talk on fashion and make up, music, trends and Dare Magazine.
The channel promotes relevant product offers (at a local level) and provides tons of news around everything and anything beauty! Up to 16,000 colleagues (the family) have taken ownership and able to interact with the presenter via phone, email and social media, requesting special songs and specific airtime for colleagues and customers.
There are live links with head office and broadcasts form the Pink Bus on tour. The flexibility of the channel is immense. To celebrate Superdrug’s 50th Birthday, the entire output was changed to reflect the special day which included a new music library from the 60’s and 70’s.
“Immedia have a been an invaluable in updating our instore audio proposition.  Their product is quite frankly excellent. The live radio format has step changed our instore experience for both customers and colleagues a like. The day to day working relationship has gone from strength to strength since an impressive roll out schedule with many key stakeholders across our business using the live radio to voice important updates to the entire business in one go. Immedia come highly recommended” – Matt Walburn, Marketing Director, Superdrug.
 

















MUSIC / ENTERTAINMENT / CONVERSATION / INTERACTION
Where Brands Shake Hands with Fans
Creating awesome digital channels since 1999







Almost everything in life comes with a sound
What does your family sound like?
It's simple, we create 'brand fans' by using the emotional glue of amazing music, brand conversation and engaging entertainment. We will provide you with an interactive digital channel enabling a closer connection with the people in your world.
Conversation - Our place or yours?











































































































































































































Word On the Street
Family & Fan Chat






 Stuff



JD New Immedia Client

On 27 September, the Group issued a statement that it had won a three year contract with an undisclosed retailer. The Board is pleased to announce tha…






 Tweet








 Face It





The best job in the world for a music fan
At Immedia we spend an enormous part of our days making sure our clients in the UK and around the world use right music for their brands.
We’re looking for a music specialist to join the team. Someone who instinctively knows the right music for the right audience in the right place.
We are looking for a dynamic person to spend their time working with music and designing a broad range of playlists which will be heard by millions each week.
We’re after someone with a deep love and knowledge of music of all eras and genres, someone who’s as confident with metal as they are with musicals (and all points in-between)
If you’re the person for this job, if you’re the person who knows their music from Adele to the Zombies and you have an understanding of what music people want to hear and when, then apply before Santa’s done his bit.
Email your response to [email protected], or write to Euan McMorrow, Immedia Group plc, 7-9 Broadway, Newbury, Berkshire, RG14 1AS 

Superdrug and Immedia win the award for best 'In-store customer service initiative of the year' at the Retail Week Customer Experience awards 

http://flexibleboss.com/2015/08/10/radio-contact-reaching-remote-workers/ 

#6YearsWithoutMichaelJackson http://buff.ly/1RyRHD8 

This is brilliant, where a truck with a pixel screen helps drivers to overtake with safety
petapixel.com/2015/06/20/samsungs-safety-truck-features-a-camera-and-live-view-display/ … 

http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/science/science-news/11516884/A-bit-of-Abba-with-your-fish-sir-How-music-can-make-your-food-taste-better.html 





 Vibes








Lou Loves
Rita Ora
Body On Me









Euan Loves
Sigala
Easy Love









Chris Loves
Club Cheval
Discipline









Sean Loves
The Chemical Brothers
Go









Lou Loves
Carly Rae Jepsen
Run Away With Me









Tom Loves
Vår
Brodermordet









Shaun Loves
My Bloody Valentine
Only Shallow









Sean Loves
Mobb Deep
Shook Ones Part II









Tom Loves
Kraftwerk
Computer Liebe









Shaun Loves
Nina Simone
Buck














We Are Family
Eat, sleep, innovate for our clients, that's all we care about - and we're good fun too!
















Clever Clogs?
 Conversation?


+44 (0)8456 301 635
[email protected]

Immedia Group PLC, 7-9 The Broadway, Newbury, Berkshire, RG14 1AS (p.s. very near London) United Kingdom

Terms & Privacy



 

 

 

 

 

 

















 

		AVC Immedia wins contract with FIFA - RNS - London Stock Exchange

 






 




 



RNS Reach Story


Go to market news section

  
			
			










Immedia Group PLC  -  IME   
AVC Immedia wins contract with FIFA
Released 07:00 15-Sep-2016

















RNS Number : 8780J Immedia Group PLC 15 September 2016  

 
15 September 2016
Immedia Group Plc
("Immedia" or "the Group")
AVC Immedia wins contracts with FIFA
 
 
Immedia (AIM: IME), a supplier of multi-media content solutions for leading brands and global businesses, is pleased to announce that its recently acquired subsidiary, AVC Immedia (previously AVC Media), a media and communications business and digital technology specialist, has won new contracts to supply FIFA with its Matchviewer tool, during four upcoming tournaments, and, as a trial, to control all content on FIFA TV's YouTube channel for the FIFA Futsal World Cup in Colombia.
 
AVC Immedia has been working with FIFA since the 1986 Football World Cup, during which they filmed and edited highlights from all the matches broadcast around the world. Since then, the company has worked with FIFA, focusing at grass root level. 
 
Matchviewer, which was first used at the Japan World Cup in 2008, is a unique analysis software tool developed by AVC Immedia and used by FIFA since its launch.  It allows the clients' delegates to access real time sports content from mobile devices, whenever and wherever they choose. FIFA's delegates will be able to view match analysis in real time on Matchviewer, as a video with statistics. Post-match statistics will also be readily available seconds after the game has finished.
 
In the YouTube trial, AVC Immedia will control the FIFA TV YouTube channel, creating teasers for the tournament and analysis-style videos of Futsal World Cup action. AVC Immedia will also create 32 videos, showing some of the best football pitches in the world and how they are created. Video of Manchester City's training facility will be completed and uploaded by the end of September.
 
The four tournaments covered by this latest contract are the FIFA Futsal World Cup in Colombia, the FIFA U-20 and U-17 Women's Football World Cup and the FIFA Club World Cup Japan. Futsal is a fast-paced small sided football game that is widely played across the world that requires technical skill and ability in high pressure situations.
 
Bruno Brookes, Chief Executive of Immedia, said:
 
"I am delighted to announce this contract win so soon after the acquisition of AVC Immedia.  We firmly believe that this business is a fantastic addition to the Group, as it strengthens our multi-media content offering for clients in our primary target sectors of retail, workforce, sport and education, as well as having a truly blue chip client list.  
 
 AVC Immedia is also adapting and developing the Matchviewer product for other sports.
 
 
 
For further information please contact:
 




Hudson Sandler
Cat Valentine / Bertie Berger
 


Tel:  +44 (0) 207 796 4133




 
About Immedia Group Plc - www.immediaplc.com
 
Immedia Group Plc is a multi-media content and digital solutions provider to global businesses and organisations, who are investing in internal and/or Brand communications. Our interactive audio channels deliver original and relevant content, via Immedia's Dreamstream platform, to a client's workforce and its customer base. Each channel is supported with powerful data analytics tools, which monitor audience activity and provide data to enable us to enhance audience engagement.
 
The Group also creates original video content, 3D & 4D animation, app and web development, as well as supplying and installing Audio Visual equipment. Immedia's clients include, amongst others, HSBC, Subway Europe, Superdrug, BT Openreach, O2, FIFA, Shell and BP.

This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange   END  NRAAKQDQABKDACD

	


Close


 

 















 






 



London Stock Exchange plc is not responsible for and does not check content on this Website. Website users are responsible for checking content. Any news item (including any prospectus) which is addressed solely to the persons and countries specified therein should not be relied upon other than by such persons and/or outside the specified countries. Terms and conditions, including restrictions on use and distribution apply.



©2014 London Stock Exchange plc. All rights reserved



 
AVC Immedia wins contract with FIFA - RNS











 

Immedia Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis



























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance

Retail






Retail


Consumer Goods


Food & Beverage







Industry

Chemicals

IT & Technology

Life Sciences

Services






Freight & Trucking
Air Freight
Freight & Trucking Company Reports
Rail Freight
Road Freight
Water Freight


Media & Entertainment
Casino and Gaming
Cinema & Theater
Magazine & Newspaper
Media Company Reports
Music
Social Media
Television & Radio


Food Service
Fast Food
Restaurants
Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports
Pub & Bar


Consumer Services
Education
Hotels
Legal Services
Logistics
Post & Courier
Recruitment
Rent
Sports & Fitness Center
Travel & Leisure
Other Services








About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Services

Media & Entertainment

Media Company Reports





Immedia Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis





Date:
June 15, 2017



Pages:
30


Price:




US$ 200.00




License             [?]:


Single User - US$ 200.00
Corporate License - US$ 400.00




Publisher:
datamining


Report type:
Strategic Report


Delivery:

E-mail Delivery (PDF)


ID:
IC3BE595F4AB1EN



        Leaflet:
    

Download PDF Leaflet






















Abstracts
Contents
List of Tables
List of Figures





Immedia Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results.

Scope

Business Description – A detailed description of the company’s principal activities.
Locations, Subsidiaries, Associated Companies – A list of key locations, subsidiaries and associated companies of Immedia Group plc with contact details.
Milestones and History – An overview of the major events associated with the company.
Key Employee Information – A list of Immedia Group plc key executives and their brief biographies.
Major Products and Services – A list of major products, services and brands of the company.
SWOT Analysis – An in-depth analysis of the company’s Strengths, Weakness, Opportunities and Threats.
Financial Analysis - Updated info on income statement, balance sheet and cash flows key figures; main financial ratios and capital market snapshot.
Key Competitors – A list of key Immedia Group plc competitors.
Latest News – Company related news bulletins.



1 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - OVERVIEW

1.1 Immedia Group plc - Business Description
1.2 Immedia Group plc - Locations, Subsidiaries, Associated Companies
1.3 Immedia Group plc - Milestones and History

2 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - KEY EMPLOYEE INFORMATION

3 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - OWNERSHIP AND MAJOR HOLDERS

4 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - MAJOR PRODUCTS AND SERVICES

5 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - SWOT ANALYSIS

5.1 Immedia Group plc - Strengths
5.2 Immedia Group plc - Weaknesses
5.3 Immedia Group plc - Opportunities
5.4 Immedia Group plc - Threats

6 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC – FINANCIAL ANALYSIS

6.1 Immedia Group plc - Financial Snapshot
6.2 Immedia Group plc – Stock Market Snapshot

7 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - KEY COMPETITORS

8 IMMEDIA GROUP PLC - LATEST NEWS 

APPENDIX

About datamining
Sources and Methodology
Ratio Definitions
Disclaimer

You will receive the report in 24 hours after the purchase as it takes one business day to update it so you can get the most recent data available.



LIST OF TABLES

Table 1: Immedia Group plc Key Facts 
Table 2: Immedia Group plc Offices and Representations 
Table 3: Immedia Group plc Milestones and History 
Table 4: Immedia Group plc Key Executives 
Table 5: Immedia Group plc Key Executives Biographies 
Table 6: Immedia Group plc Major Shareholders 
Table 7: Immedia Group plc Products and Services
Table 8: Immedia Group plc SWOT Analysis
Table 9: Immedia Group plc Profitability 
Table 10: Immedia Group plc Management Effectiveness
Table 11: Immedia Group plc Income Statement Key Figures 
Table 12: Immedia Group plc Balance Sheet Key Figures 
Table 13: Immedia Group plc Cash Flow Key Figures 
Table 14: Immedia Group plc Capital Market Snapshot 



LIST OF FIGURES

Figure 1: Immedia Group plc Operating Margin Chart 
Figure 2: Immedia Group plc Profit Margin Chart 
Figure 3: Immedia Group plc Return on Assets (ROA) Chart
Figure 4: Immedia Group plc Return on Equity (ROE) Chart 
Figure 5: Immedia Group plc Debt to Equity Chart 
Figure 6: Immedia Group plc Current Ratio Chart 
Figure 7: Immedia Group plc 1-year Stock Chart 
Figure 8: Immedia Group plc 5-year Stock Chart
        
        
Skip to top




MORE PUBLICATIONS


Immedia Group plc Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Jul, 2017 · 50 pages


Moiselle International Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


Andhra Petrochemicals Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


Christian Dior SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


Jian ePayment Systems Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages








Ask Your Question
Immedia Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis







Company name*:



Contact person*:



Phone/fax*:



Email*:




 Request invoice


Your enquiry:




				Please click on a Check Box below to confirm you are not a robot:
					


























Market Reports


All Categories  Consumer Services Education Food Service Fast Food Restaurants Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports Pub & Bar  Freight & Trucking Air Freight Freight & Trucking Company Reports Rail Freight Road Freight Water Freight  Hotels Legal Services Logistics Post & Courier Recruitment Rental Sports & Fitness Center Travel & Leisure Media & Entertainment Casino and Gaming Cinema & Theater Magazine & Newspaper Media Company Reports Music Social Media Television & Radio  Utilities Company Reports Other Services 












Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:

























Pair correlation between Immedia Group and WPP plc - Macroaxis






























































Research Hub




Sign In











Sign In


New Account



About Macroaxis


Settings


Plans & Pricing



 Toggle Menu


 Toggle Fullscreen







   Markets




Equities




Portfolios




Stories






×











 My Equities
Investing Ideas

Free Tools

World Markets Map
Cryptocurrency Center
Equity Research
Company Directory
Insider Directory
Buy or Sell Recommendation
Pair Correlation
Stocks Correlation
Pattern Recognition
Watchlist Analysis



 Services

Technology Overview
Solution Methodology
Acknowledgement
Product Tour
FAQs



 About Us

About Macroaxis
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
Advertising



Sign In   DOW   21,830  0.15% CitigroupAstoria FinancialBank of New YorkCanadian Imperial






World
US



















Pair Correlation Between Immedia Group and WPP plc




















			Equity Search



			 Company Directory




			 Suggest Portfolio



		   Backtest Watchlist



		  Analyze Correlations



			View Transactions



		   Check Volatility




			 Import Equities









Companies in United States
Insiders
Advisers
Ideas
Correlations
Volatility
News
Funds
ETFs
Crypto










	Upgrade to remove ads 




	This module allows you to analyze existing cross correlation between Immedia Group Plc and  WPP plc. You can compare the effects of market volatilities on Immedia Group and WPP plc and check how they will diversify away market risk if combined in the same portfolio for a given time horizon. You can also utilize pair trading strategies of matching a long position in Immedia Group with a short position of WPP plc. See also your portfolio center. Please also check ongoing floating volatility patterns of Immedia Group and WPP plc.







          Investment Horizon  
          
      

	      
	      	  30 Days   
Login
  to change
	      	






SymbolsvsRun Correlation


		
	

 Immedia Group plc IME  vs   WPP Plc WPP Performance (%)       Timeline Pair Volatility If you would invest  2,500  in Immedia Group Plc on July 2, 2017 and sell it today you would earn a total of  0.00  from holding Immedia Group Plc or generate 0.0% return on investment  over 30 days. Correlation CoefficientPair Corralation between Immedia Group and WPP plc0.0ParametersTime Period1 Month [change]DirectionFlat StrengthInsignificantAccuracy100.0%ValuesDaily ReturnsDiversificationPay attentionOverlapping area represents the amount of risk that can be diversified away by holding Immedia Group plc IME and WPP Plc WPP in the same portfolio assuming nothing else is changed. The correlation between historical prices or returns on WPP Plc WPP and Immedia Group is a relative statistical measure of the degree to which these equity instruments tend to move together. The correlation coefficient measures the extent to which returns on Immedia Group Plc are associated (or correlated) with WPP plc. Values of the correlation coefficient range from -1 to +1, where. The  correlation of zero (0) is possible when the price movement of WPP Plc WPP has no effect on the direction of Immedia Group i.e. Immedia Group and WPP plc go up and down completely randomly. Compare Dividends    Optimize

Comparative Volatility

 Predicted Return Density       Returns Immedia Group plcPremiums Correlation Profile0  Risk-Adjusted PerformanceOver the last 30 days Immedia Group Plc has generated negative risk-adjusted returns  adding no value to investors with long positions. Check PerformanceBacktestPredict PriceImmedia Group PlcPair trading matchups for Immedia GroupFuture PLC vs. Immedia Group PlcMC Saatchi plc vs. Immedia Group PlcSpaceandpeople plc vs. Immedia Group PlcMirada Plc vs. Immedia Group PlcWPP Plc WPPPremiums Correlation Profile0  Risk-Adjusted PerformanceOver the last 30 days WPP plc has generated negative risk-adjusted returns  adding no value to investors with long positions. Check PerformanceBacktestPredict PriceWPP plcPair trading matchups for WPP plcFuture PLC vs. WPP plcMC Saatchi plc vs. WPP plcSpaceandpeople plc vs. WPP plcMirada Plc vs. WPP plc

  
       
       
 





Updating Transaction...
	






	Report was successfully generated
	



































































































			© 2017 Macroaxis LLC All rights reserved  
		








Insiders
Companies
Contact Us
Feedback
Widgets









































Media Company Research Reports


























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance






Finance Services
Banking
Cards
Credit & Loans
Financial Company Reports
Investment
Mortgage
Payment
Other Financial Services


Insurance
General Insurance
Health Insurance
Insurance Company Reports
Life Insurance
Property Insurance
Reinsurance
Auto Insurance


Business Services
Accounting & Tax Services
Advertising
Brokerage
Business Support
Business Services Company Reports
Consulting
Diversified Services Company Reports
Franchise
Wealth Management


Company Reports
Business Survey
Real Estate





Retail






Retail
Cash & Carry
Convenience Stores
Department Stores
Duty Free
Hypermarkets & Supermarkets
Online Retail
Retail Company Reports
Service Station Retail
Specialist Store
Wholesale 

Consumer Goods
Consumer Products Company Reports
Cosmetics & Hygiene Products
Furnishing
Jewelry & Accessories
Household Products
Pet Products
Sporting Goods & Equipment
Stationery
Textile & Leather
Tobacco
Toys & Games 

Food & Beverage
Alcoholic Drinks
Soft Drinks
Food
Food & Beverage Company Reports







Industry






Agriculture
Agribusiness
Agricultural Products
Animal Husbandry
Fisheries
Fertilizers
Gardening & Forestry

Construction
Building Materials
Building Products Company Reports
Commercial Construction
Engineering & Construction Services Company Report
Industrial construction
Infrastructure
Residential Construction


Energy
Alternative Energy
Batteries & Accumulators
Electric Power
Energy Company Reports
Nuclear Power
Smart Grid
Thermal Power

Metallurgy
Alkali Metals
Ferrous Metallurgy
Metal Alloys
Metal products
Metals & Mining Company Reports
Non-Ferrous Metallurgy
Precious Metals
Rare-Earth Metals
Uranous Metals (Actinoid)


Mineral Raw Materials
Building Raw Materials & Fillers
Conglomerates Company Reports
Fossil Fuel
Nonmetallic Minerals
Metalloids
Ores
Precious & Semi-Precious Stones


Machinery & Equipment
Defence & Security
Packaging Industry
Publishing Industry
Pulp & Paper
Vehicle
Other Industries






Chemicals






Organic Chemicals
Alcohols
Alkenes (Olefins)
Ethers
Organic Acids & Derivatives
Aldehydes & Ketones
Amines
Halogenated
Polymers
Alkanes
Benzene & Derivatives
Isocyanates


Inorganic Chemicals
Alkali
Inorganic Salts
Non-Metallic Oxides
Inorganic Acids
Metal Oxides


Chemical Company Reports
Chemical Reports by CAS Number
Composite Materials
Oils & Lubricants






IT & Technology






Consumer Electronics
Audio & Video Equipment
GPS Navigation
Mobile Phones & Smartphones
PC & Notebooks
Photography


Hardware
Computer Hardware
Computers & Electronic Equipment Company Reports
Data Storage
Networking Hardware


Software
Application Software
Operating System
Programming Software
Software Development
Software & Technology Services Company Reports
Video Games


Telecommunications
Broadband
Communication Services Company Reports
Internet
Mobile
Networks
Telecom Equipment
Wireless Technology






Life Sciences






Medical Devices
Anesthesia & Respiratory
Cardiovascular Devices
Dental
Diabetes Care
Diagnostic Equipment
Drug Delivery
Endoscopy
Ear, Nose & Throat (ENT)
Healthcare Equipment/Supplies Company Reports
Implants
Neurology
Orthopedic
Ophthalmic
Surgical Equipment
Wound Closure
Other Medical Devices


Biotechnology
Biomarkers
Biomaterials
Biosimilars
Stem Cell

Diagnostics & Diseases
In Vitro Diagnostics
Incontinence
Cancer
Cardiovascular
Diabetes
Hepatitis


Healthcare
Healthcare Services Company Reports
Ear Care
Eye Care
Hospital
Medicated Skin Care
Therapy
Wound Care


Pharmaceuticals
Clinical Trial
Drug Stores
Drugs
Pharmaceuticals Company Reports
Vaccines

Medical Products
Veterinary






Services






Freight & Trucking
Air Freight
Freight & Trucking Company Reports
Rail Freight
Road Freight
Water Freight


Media & Entertainment
Casino and Gaming
Cinema & Theater
Magazine & Newspaper
Media Company Reports
Music
Social Media
Television & Radio


Food Service
Fast Food
Restaurants
Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports
Pub & Bar


Consumer Services
Education
Hotels
Legal Services
Logistics
Post & Courier
Recruitment
Rent
Sports & Fitness Center
Travel & Leisure
Other Services








About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Services

Media & Entertainment

Media Company Reports








Media Company Research Reports


Companies in the Media (or ‘mass media’) industry are involved in multiple activities in the areas such as broadcast media (radio and TV), publishing (printing), recordings (audio cassettes, CDs, DVDs, etc.), movies, digital media (the Net and cellular phones), and others, aimed at reaching the majority of mass audience.
The Media world witnessed formidable growth throughout the former ten years thanks to the technology breakthroughs in the broadcasting and printing sectors, evoked by the elevated significance of modifying media usage patterns. By end-2017, the market is anticipated to crawl to a world value of nearly EUR 958 billion. North America, steered by the U.S., is the globe’s largest, though a slow-growing, marketplace. The global media space is chaired by such giants as Comcast Corporation, Time Warner, News Corporation, Google, and Walt Disney. 
This Catalogue embeds the research reports casting light on the opportunities and hardships facing Media Companies worldwide. The research reports discuss the companies’ geographical footprints; provide their competitive benchmarking, financial statements, SWOT analyses, products’ positioning, marketing tactics, and corporate strategies. Highlights of Media Companies’ income levels, ad spending, as well as of governmental incentives are featured in the research reports too.





All Regions
Global
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                        

Media Company Reports


All Publishers BAC Industry Comparative Analysis
                        BAC SWOT Company Reports
                        datamining
                        GlobalData
                        Omi Advisories
                    



                            Found
                                 2581 publications                    



Zurvita Holdings, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zurvita Holdings, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


ZoomerMedia Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
ZoomerMedia Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


ZON Multimedia Servicos de Telecomunicacoes e Multimedia SGPS SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
ZON Multimedia Servicos de Telecomunicacoes e Multimedia SGPS SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zinkia Entertainment SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zinkia Entertainment SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zhejiang Huace Film & TV Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zhejiang Huace Film & TV Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zenrin Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zenrin Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zee News Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zee News Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zee Entertainment Enterprises Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zee Entertainment Enterprises Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Z3 Enterprises Inc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Z3 Enterprises Inc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YTN - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YTN - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Your Family Entertainment AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Your Family Entertainment AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Young Broadcasting, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Young Broadcasting, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YouBlast Global, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YouBlast Global, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Global Yellow Pages Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Global Yellow Pages Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yellow Media Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yellow Media Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yell Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yell Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yedang Company Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yedang Company Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YeaRimDang Publishing Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YeaRimDang Publishing Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


XNE, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
XNE, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


XK Tegopoulos Editions SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
XK Tegopoulos Editions SA - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xinhua Sports & Entertainment Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xinhua Sports & Entertainment Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xinhua Finance Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xinhua Finance Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xing Lin Medical Information Technology Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xing Lin Medical Information Technology Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xilam Animation - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xilam Animation - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xanadoo Company - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xanadoo Company - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


XA Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
XA Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Writers' Group Film Corp - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Writers' Group Film Corp - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


World Wrestling Entertainment Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
World Wrestling Entertainment Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WPP plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WPP plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wowow Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wowow Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Works Media Group (The) PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Works Media Group (The) PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Work Point Entertainment plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Work Point Entertainment plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Woongjin Thinkbig Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Woongjin Thinkbig Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Woongjin Holdings Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Woongjin Holdings Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wolters Kluwer NV - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wolters Kluwer NV - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WLMG Holding Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WLMG Holding Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wire and Wireless India Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wire and Wireless India Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wilmington Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wilmington Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


William H. Sadlier, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
William H. Sadlier, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wige Media AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wige Media AG - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wi-Fi TV, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wi-Fi TV, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WFCA plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WFCA plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Westwood One Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Westwood One Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


West Australian Newspapers Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
West Australian Newspapers Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wellmade STAR M Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wellmade STAR M Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wedge Holdings Co. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wedge Holdings Co. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Weborama - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Weborama - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Web Media Group Ad - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Web Media Group Ad - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wave Entertainment PCL - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wave Entertainment PCL - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Watford Leisure plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Watford Leisure plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages




1
2
3
4
5
>

Skip to top





Market Reports


All Categories  Consumer Services Education Food Service Fast Food Restaurants Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports Pub & Bar  Freight & Trucking Air Freight Freight & Trucking Company Reports Rail Freight Road Freight Water Freight  Hotels Legal Services Logistics Post & Courier Recruitment Rental Sports & Fitness Center Travel & Leisure Media & Entertainment Casino and Gaming Cinema & Theater Magazine & Newspaper Media Company Reports Music Social Media Television & Radio  Utilities Company Reports Other Services 






Need Help?

								+44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
				+1 732 587 5005 (USA)
info@marketpublishers.com







Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:























	Immedia Group PLC - Roll Out of Music Radio Station







26/04/2012 07:00
|
Immedia Group PLC

RNS Number : 0778C Immedia Group PLC 26 April 2012  

Immedia Group Plc
 
("Immedia" or "the Company")
 
 
Roll-out of Music Radio Station
 
 
 
Immedia Group Plc (AIM: IME), which provides bespoke radio stations and a range of in-store media solutions for retailers, today confirms the roll out of a music radio station to over 450 O2 stores.
 
The 'real time' solution which uses Immedia's Dreamstream technology, enables O2 to use content to promote all aspects of its lifestyle brand to a local store level. Together with a new in store music strategy, the service will include live broadcasts from its own studio and other content from live music venues including the O2 Arena and the O2 Music Academies.
 
CEO of Immedia, Bruno Brookes said: "We are delighted to be working with one of the most creative brands in the UK. O2 stores will hugely benefit from our technology which 'groups stores together as one' but also enables each location to have its own voice to promote specific geographical business objectives".
 
Contact:
 
Immedia Group Plc
Bruno Brookes Chief Executive
Tel: +44(0)1635 556200
 
 
Daniel Stewart and Co Plc
Paul Shackleton 
Tel: +44(0)207 776 6550
 
 
About Immedia Group Plc 
 
Immedia has developed a strong reputation for providing in-store music and communications solutions designed to drive experiential marketing strategies and staff communications. 
 
Our mission is to help companies in retail, banking, leisure and hospitality to meet the expectations of customers by creating sensory content and marketing communications to drive product awareness and sales.
 
Immedia services include 'The Sound of your Brand' music and tonality strategies, designed and delivered to amplify your brand's personality with interactive audio communications. 
 
Immedia also provides leading edge visual display technology and its systems enable the management of essential marketing communications to a localised level.
 
Immedia was founded by BBC Radio One personality Bruno Brookes in 2000. The client list includes brands like HSBC, Lloyds Bank, Ikea, Spar, Game, Topshop and Bupa.
 
Immedia is headquartered in Newbury, Berkshire.
 
 
 
 
 

This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange   END  MSCPGUWCCUPPGAA
    
















Immedia Group plc. - Trading Update - Proactiveinvestors (UK)



























































































Pro NAPro AU Pro HK FULLER TREACY MONEY StockTube Mining Capital Oil Capital Tech Capital Biotech Capital CN 

   
Sign up 


UNITED KINGDOM


USA
Australia
Germany
China




Login 






×
Send Email







To: *

Separate multiple addresses with commas.



From:




Name:





Please send me a copy



Message:









Verification code: *

  

Enter the code from above 





Send














×
Preferences

Profile

Password






Edit your personal details

EmailFirst NameLast NameMobile/CellHome/DaytimeWorkGender

Male
Female
HometownPrimary CountryCorporate WebsiteI want to get marketing materials from Proactive InvestorsMore about yourselfTell us a little bit about you and your interestsOccupationPortfolio Size

No portfolio
€1 - €49,000
€50,000 - €99,000
€100,000 - €499,000
€500,000 - €1,000,000
+€1000,000
Interest(You can select more then one)
General Interest
Educational
Private Investor
Professional Investor
Institutional Investor
Hedge Fund Manager
Public Relations
Financial Services
Broker
Media / Press
 

Change your password

PasswordPassword Repeat 











×
Contact Support



 

Your email: *Problematic page url *Message * 
Verification code
  
Enter the code from above * 
 





























 

×

 
Advanced Search


Keyword  

Search by 

CHANNEL
SECTOR
MARKET
AUTHOR
 



Energy
Mining
Pharma & Biotech
Tech
In Focus
 

Aerospace
Aerospace & Defense
Agribusiness
Automobiles & Parts
Banks
Basic Materials
Beverages
Broadcasting & Entertainment 
Building Material & Fixtures
Business Support Services
Capital Goods
Chemicals
Cleantech and Renewable Energy
Clothing & Footwear
Computer Hardware
Computer Services
Construction & Materials
Consumer Finance
Consumer Services
Diamonds & Gemstones
Education
Electronic & Electrical Equipment
Energy
Engineering
Equity Instruments
ETF - Exchange-Traded Fund 
Exploration & Production
Financial
Financial Admin
Food & Beverages
Food & Drug Retailers
Forestry & Paper
Furnishings
Gambling
General Financials
General Industry
General Mining
General Mining - Coal
General Mining - Copper
General Mining - Diamonds & Gemstones
General Mining - Gold
General Mining - Iron Ore and Bauxite
General Mining - Lithium
General Mining - Moly, Chrome, Tungsten & Manganese
General Mining - Nickel and Cobalt
General Mining - Platinum Group Metals
General Mining - Potash and Phosphate
General Mining - Rare Earth Minerals
General Mining - Silver
General Mining - Uranium & Lithium
General Mining - Zinc, Lead and Tin
General Retailers
Gold Mining
Growth Companies
Health Care, Equipment & Services
Industrial Machinery
Industrial Metals
Industrial Suppliers
Insurance
Integrated Oil & Gas
Internet
Internet
Investment Funds & Companies
Investment Services
IT Hardware
Leisure
Manufacturing
Media & Publishing
Medical Cannabis
Mining
Mobile Communications
Multiutilities
Nonequity Investment Instruments
Oil & Gas
Oil & Gas Equipment & Services
Oil & Gas Exploration & Production
Other Industry News
Personal Products
Pharma & Biotech
Pharmaceuticals
Platinum & Precious Metals
Real Estate
Real Estate Holding & Development
Recreational Services
Renewable Energy
Restaurants, pubs
Semiconductors
Software & Computer Services
Specialty Chemicals
Specialty Finance
Specialty Retailers
Sports
Support Services
Tech
Technology Hardware & Equipment
Telecommunications Equipment
Telecoms
Telecoms services
Transportation
Travel Leisure
Travel, Leisure & Hospitality
Utilities
 

All UK Markets
All North American Markets
PRIVATE
AIM
OTCQB
PINK
TMP
AMEX
LSE
PLUS
ASX
TSX
JSE
NASDAQ
FRA
TSX-V
OTCBB
KRX
OTC
FFT
NYSE
XETRA
ISE
MCE
CSE
COLOMBO
NASDAQ OMX
OSL
GXG
GSX
NSX
NEX
OTCMKTS
EPA
SGX
Frankfurt Code 
NYSEMKT
ETR
HKG
AEX 
 

Ian Mclelland
Craig Ribton
Ian Lyall
Philip Whiterow
Sam Kiri
Ruth Gemmell
Andrew McCrea
John Phillips
John Harrington 
Deborah Bacal
Carrie Howes
Brian Keane
Peter Murray
Jamie Ashcroft
Giles Gwinnett
Northland Capital 
Deborah Sterescu
Charlotte Kan
Anwar Ali
Bevis Yeo
Mourad Haroutunian
Gordon Aldcorn
Alessandro Bruno 
Jane Sully
Jackie Steinitz
Steve Asfour
Natasha Barr 
Proactive Investors
John McGoldrick
SP Angel
HB Markets
Ransquawk
Fuller Treavy
Galvan
Trader Talk
Hybridan
Fox-Davies
Fat Prophets
Alistair Strang
Edison's weekly research summary
The Naked Trader
Keith Heddle
Michael Millar
Angus Warren 
Beaufort Securities
Markets At A Glance 
Sprott Group
Susan McKenzie
Charlotte Kan 
Leigh Bolton
Adam Sheldrake
Sophie Barrowman
Emma Milton
Northland Capital
IG Group
Malcolm Graham-Wood
Nick Huber
Nicola Brown
Andrew Neil
Shard Capital
Damon Heath
Gareth Burchell
Juliet Mann
Jon Hopkins
Accendo Markets 
Sarah Lowther
Greg Watson
Nigel Roberts
.
Fuller Treacy Money
Philip Waller 
Jonathan Jones
Alastair Ford
Glen Jones
Thomas Coleman
Stewart Dalby 
Eithne Treanor
RFC Ambrian
Ben Marlow
Richard Embrey
Ebiquity
Kieron Hodgson
Stefania Barbaglio
Sasha Sethi
Jeremy Naylor
Jamie Nimmo
Carrie White
George Matlock
Josh Allsopp 
Tom Howard
VSA Capital 
George Matlock 
Charles Breese 
Roger Lawson
Andrew Scott
Jonathon Narvey 
Jonathon Narvey
Angela Kean
Christine Feary
Andre Lamberti
Jeff Coote
Sergei Balashov
Brad Lemaire
Joyanta Acharjee
Olivia D'Orazio
Jon Mainwaring
Ross Louthean, Mineweb.net
Fiona MacDonald
Erin Sugar
Richard Badauskas
Metals Place
Kam Patel
Julie Crust
Chris Shaw
Dorothy Kosich
Stephen Feldman
Jon Hopkins 
Tip Tv
Renae Dyer 
The Naked Fund Manager 
Helaine Kang
Sam Catalano
Lionel Therond
Riccardo Lowi
Ed Stacey
James Dolman
Ed Birkin
Youssef Essaegh
David Eaton
Fahad Changazi
James Eginton
Andy Brown
Zak Mir 
Eugene Gallagher
Nishant Varma
Christian Schmidt
Huub Verschueren
Mark A. Smith
Siva Sithraputhran 
Rachel Middleton
Paula Middlehurst 
 










 
















 

HomeLON:IMERNS Press Releases








Immedia Group plc. RNS Release
Trading Update



        Share  



 Facebook





 Twitter
            


 Google+


 LinkedIn


 Email


 Print


 Download PDF version




7:00 AM 19 Aug 2016







 RNS Number : 6063H Immedia Group PLC 19 August 2016                      19 August 2016   Immedia Group Plc ("Immedia" or the "Group")   Trading Update   Immedia Group PLC (AIM: IME), a supplier of digital audio content solutions for leading brands and global businesses, announces that its contract with Arcadia Group Ltd will expire in December 2016.      However, the Group is pleased to announce that it is seeing significantly higher than expected uptake of SUBWAY® Radio by franchisees, further to the contract announced on 8 April 2016. The Board of Immedia expects uptake to further accelerate into the next financial year as the service is rolled out across existing stores and new franchises are opened.   Immedia is also at an advanced stage of product and service development with a major UK retailer and an announcement of a substantive deal is expected in the near future.   ~ Ends ~   For further information please contact:       Immedia Group Plc Bruno Brookes - Chief Executive Officer     Tel:   +44 (0) 1635 556200     SPARK Advisory Partners Limited (NOMAD) Mark Brady/Neil Baldwin   Tel:  +44 (0) 203 368 3550     SI Capital Ltd (Broker) Nick Emerson/Andy Thacker   Tel:  +44 (0) 1483 413500     Hudson Sandler Catriona Valentine     Tel:  +44 (0) 207 796 4133       About Immedia Group Plc - www.immediaplc.com   Immedia Group Plc supplies digital audio content solutions, delivered via a scalable audio content streaming platform which enables businesses to stream bespoke digital radio channels to internal and external audiences. Each bespoke channel includes interactive functionality and powerful data analytics tools which can be used to improve and fine-tune content to help increase audience engagement.     This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange  END  TSTUWUURNAAWAUR~~>                









                    Immedia Group plc. Timeline
                





Newswire 

April 11 2017

Immedia out of tune as it swings to a loss









Newswire 

September 27 2016

Immedia on song again as it clinches retail deal 









Newswire 

August 19 2016

Immedia's Subway radio taking off









Newswire 

April 21 2016

Immedia Group shares fade as net profit falls









Newswire 

April 18 2016

Immedia Group shares up as it's set for SUBWAY roll-out









Newswire 

November 14 2014

Traders tune in as Immedia gets O2 gig









Newswire 

September 08 2009

Immedia Group extends IKEA in-store radio contract and narrows losses in first half




View All








 RSS
 Portfolio

 Follow

									
		Only registred members can create thier own customized alerts. Register or Log in 
Help 












	Only registered members can add into watchlist. Register or Log in


Immedia Group plc.
 View full company profile


	Immedia Group plc, formerly Immedia Broadcasting Plc, is a United Kingdom-based holding company. The Company’s subsidiaries include Immedia Broadcast Limited and Cube Music Limited. The principal activities of the Company’s subsidiaries are that of marketing...
Read more



	Immedia Group plc, formerly Immedia Broadcasting Plc, is a United Kingdom-based holding company. The Company’s subsidiaries include Immedia Broadcast Limited and Cube Music Limited. The principal activities of the Company’s subsidiaries are that of marketing services. Immedia’s marketing services consist of bespoke radio and audio visual programming, music and visual content and associated equipment installation to the retail industry. Its clients are predominantly blue chip businesses who use the Company’s marketing services to communicate their brand both to their customers and to their staff.
Hide text








Market:
AIM			


EPIC:
IME


Market Cap:
3.64M


Latest Price:
25.00p 
											(0,00%)


52-week H/L:
47.00p / 21.25p


Sector: 
Media & Publishing








Immedia Group plc.








1day


1year















Loading charts
















Loading charts


























                Immedia Group plc. RNS announcements
            
 

2017-05-25  Result of Annual General Meeting2017-05-15  Non Regulatory - AVC Immedia at FIFA U20 World Cup2017-04-28  Annual Report and Accounts and Notice of AGM2016-11-15  Director/PDMR Shareholding2016-11-09  Further re new client contract2016-09-29  Interim Results2016-09-27  Significant new contract win2016-09-07  Acquisition2016-08-19  Trading Update2016-07-26  Board Change

View all announcements






Proactive Investors Recommended

Growth Acceleration Programme to drive future progress for marketing analytics firm Ebiquity
Porta banishing the post-Brexit blues
Dotdigital flags up another year of growth










 



















































International:
NA
AU
DE
CN



Our Company
Term & Conditions
The Team
Contact us
Newsletter
Sitemap
Cookies
Work for us



Partners:



























  






×
Login



 
Email Password 



Sign in


Did you forget your password? Click here for recovery





Or login using...






































Acquisition | Immedia Group PLC (IME) | RNS Company Announcements | Equities  | FE Trustnet

























 


















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table













Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
































Share


Tweet






 
                    Print   
                     
                    RSS





Immedia Group PLC (IME)



Immedia Group PLC

Acquisition

RNS Number : 1380J Immedia Group PLC 07 September 2016  

 
7 September 2016
 
Immedia Group Plc
("Immedia" or the "Group")
 
Acquisition of the business and certain assets of AVC Media Enterprises Limited 
("AVC Media")
 
Immedia (AIM: IME), a supplier of digital audio content solutions for leading brands and global businesses, announces that it has acquired the business and certain assets comprising AVC Media (the "AVC Business"), based in Aberdeen, from the Administrators of AVC Media Enterprises Limited and AVCME Holdings Limited (together the "AVC Companies") for a cash consideration of £200,000, payable in full at completion.   
 
Established in 1984, the AVC Business is a media and communications business and digital technology specialist. The AVC Business encompasses a range of services, which the Board of Immedia consider are highly complementary to Immedia's activities; these include audio visual solutions, video conferencing, event production/management, video and 3D animation, web and graphic design and App development.  The AVC Companies work across many sectors and are particularly well known in oil & gas, football and tourism.  Its past and current clients include leading brands and global businesses, such as FA, FIFA, Shell, BP, Aker, SKY and BT Sport. 
 
The revenues of the AVC Business have declined rapidly over the last 18 months, as prevailing low oil prices caused a number of oil exploration and services clients to reduce significantly their spend. This has impacted the AVC Business's trading performance significantly, since AVC Media's last audited accounts for the year ended 31 March 2015, which showed revenue of £5.9m, profit before tax of £0.09m and net assets of £0.08m.  This decline resulted in the AVC Companies being placed in Administration on 6 September 2016.
 
The Board of Immedia considers that the AVC Business can be returned to profitability by implementing certain identified cost savings, synergies and cost sharing with Immedia and other measures to be implemented post completion of the acquisition.   
 
As of today the acquired business will be renamed AVC Immedia, and will operate as a division of Immedia Broadcast Ltd a wholly owned subsidiary of Immedia Group plc.
 
Bruno Brookes, Chief Executive of Immedia, said: 
 
"We have been aware of the AVC Media business for many years and believed that, should an acquisition opportunity arise, the business would be an excellent fit with Immedia, allowing us to enhance and broaden our client services.  AVC Media has an award-winning, specialist offering and a very experienced team.  Unfortunately market conditions severely affected the business, but this has enabled us to acquire AVC Media at a price which we consider to be advantageous.  
 
"The acquisition of AVC Media strengthens Immedia's multi-media content offering for clients in the Group's primary target sectors of retail, workforce, sport and education.  AVC has a strong client list and we believe that both businesses will benefit from working closely together, generating excellent access and cross-selling opportunities and providing a wider range of integrated digital services and solutions.
 
"In my Chief Executive's report in April 2016, I said that we have been extremely encouraged by an unprecedented number of strong and relevant opportunities from exciting businesses who want to work with Immedia.  This continues to be the case and we believe that the acquisition of AVC Media will both strengthen and enhance Immedia's offering and ultimate appeal to clients.
 
"I would like to take this opportunity to welcome the extended team in Aberdeen to the Immedia family. There is no doubt that, together, we will develop an even more exciting creative media business."
 
This announcement contains information which, prior to its disclosure, was inside information for the purposes of the Market Abuse Regulation.
 
~ Ends ~
 
For further information please contact:
 




Immedia Group Plc
Bruno Brookes - Chief Executive Officer


Tel:   +44 (0) 1635 556200




SPARK Advisory Partners Limited (NOMAD)
Mark Brady/Neil Baldwin


Tel:  +44 (0) 203 368 3550




SI Capital Ltd (Broker)
Nick Emerson/Andy Thacker


Tel:  +44 (0) 1483 413500




Hudson Sandler
Catriona Valentine


Tel:  +44 (0) 207 796 4133




 
 
About Immedia Group Plc - www.immediaplc.com
 
Immedia Group Plc supplies digital audio content solutions, delivered via a its scalable Dreamstream streaming platform which enables businesses to stream bespoke digital radio channels to internal and external audiences. Each bespoke channel includes interactive functionality and powerful data analytics tools which can be used to improve and fine-tune content to help increase audience engagement.
 
About AVC Immedia - www.avcimmedia.com 
 
AVC Immedia is a long established media and communications company based in Aberdeen, Scotland.  It is well known across Scotland for its solution-based approach to client projects. Award winning across a number of service offerings, AVC Immedia¹s foundations lie in its ability to work broadly across, in particular, the Energy and Sports sectors predominantly in oil & gas, football and tourism.  Past and current clients include the FA, FIFA, Shell, BP, Aker, SKY and BT Sport.
 
AVC Immedia is expert in digital technology supplying structured solutions, delivered to global businesses who want to invest in communications.  Content creation is at the heart of the business with skill sets and solutions offered in Video, 3D & 4D animation for both top side and subsea, digital media solutions in app and web development, Audio Visual supply and installation, advertising planning and design.
 
 

This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange   END  ACQUGUMWBUPQPUQ











quick links
Equity Home
Equity Prices and Performance
Latest announcements


our product portfolio
www.trustnet.com
www.trustnetoffshore.com
www.trustnetmiddleeast.com


 
www.investegate.co.uk
www.fundlistings.com
FE Analytics


 
Data feeds
Factsheet and literature Production
Webtools










Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
























Non Regulatory - AVC Immedia at FIFA U20 World Cup | Immedia Group PLC (IME) | RNS Company Announcements | Equities  | FE Trustnet

























 


















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table













Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
































Share


Tweet






 
                    Print   
                     
                    RSS





Immedia Group PLC (IME)



Immedia Group PLC

Non Regulatory - AVC Immedia at FIFA U20 World Cup

RNS Number : 0464F Immedia Group PLC 15 May 2017  

 
 
 15 May 2017
 
RNS REACH ANNOUNCEMENT (NON-REGULATORY):
 
IMMEDIA GROUP PLC
 
("Immedia", the "Company" or the "Group")
 
Non-regulatory - AVC Immedia at FIFA Under 20 World Cup in South Korea
 
 
Aberdeen based AVC Immedia, acquired in September 2016 by Immedia Group Plc, is delighted to announce its participation at the FIFA Under 20 World Cup in South Korea later this month as part of the FIFA working party to capture content from the tournament.  AVC Immedia will also be involved in post event work to create video learning tools aimed at encouraging the development of the "beautiful game" at youth level.
 
AVC Immedia has also licensed its proprietary software Matchviewer to FIFA for capturing game analysis and key incidents during tournaments, predominantly video clips that are logged securely and then accessed by FIFA delegates regardless of proximity to the tournament.
 
AVC Immedia Managing Director Spencer Buchan commented: 
 
"This is fantastic news; AVC first attended the Mexico 86 FIFA World Cup and we have worked consistently with FIFA as a global partner on many projects since then.  The remit for what we do has changed from tournament to tournament; in Korea we will be filming at the games to create content for post tournament development purposes.  AVC Immedia was selected from other partners across the world to attend so we are very proud to continue our long standing relationship with FIFA.
 
Our recent visit to India as part of the UK Trade and Industry delegation to promote UK sports businesses' involvement in the development of football in India is further evidence that AVC Immedia is in the digital vanguard of global sport."
  
 
~ENDS~
 
For further information, please contact:
 




Immedia Group Plc







Bruno Brookes - Chief Executive
Spencer Buchan - MD (AVC Immedia)


Tel: +44 (0) 1635 556200
Tel: +44 (0) 1224 392803




www.immediaplc.com







SPARK Advisory Partners Limited (NOMAD)
Mark Brady/Neil Baldwin


Tel:  +44 (0) 203 368 3550




SI Capital Ltd (Broker)
Nick Emerson/Andy Thacker


Tel:  +44 (0) 1483 413 500
 
 




 
 
Note for Editors
Immedia Group Plc is a multi-media content and digital solutions provider to global businesses and organisations, who are investing in internal and/or Brand communications. Our interactive audio channels deliver original and relevant content, via Immedia's Dreamstream platform, to a client's workforce and its customer base. Each channel is supported with powerful data analytics tools, which monitor audience activity and provide data to enable us to enhance audience engagement.
 
The Group also creates original video content, 3D & 4D animation, app and web development, as well as supplying and installing Audio Visual equipment. Immedia's clients include, amongst others, HSBC, Subway Europe, Superdrug, JD Sports Fashion plc, O2, FIFA, Shell and BP.
 
The 2017 FIFA U-20 World Cup will be the 21st edition of the tournament, which is the biennial international men's youth football championship contested by the under-20 national teams of the member associations of FIFA since its inception in 1977 as the FIFA World Youth Championship. The tournament will be hosted by South Korea between 20 May and 11 June 2017.
 
 

This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange   END  NRAFMGMKDZVGNZM











quick links
Equity Home
Equity Prices and Performance
Latest announcements


our product portfolio
www.trustnet.com
www.trustnetoffshore.com
www.trustnetmiddleeast.com


 
www.investegate.co.uk
www.fundlistings.com
FE Analytics


 
Data feeds
Factsheet and literature Production
Webtools










Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
























Immedia Group plc. - Interim Results - Proactiveinvestors (UK)



























































































Pro NAPro AU Pro HK FULLER TREACY MONEY StockTube Mining Capital Oil Capital Tech Capital Biotech Capital CN 

   
Sign up 


UNITED KINGDOM


USA
Australia
Germany
China




Login 






×
Send Email







To: *

Separate multiple addresses with commas.



From:




Name:





Please send me a copy



Message:









Verification code: *

  

Enter the code from above 





Send














×
Preferences

Profile

Password






Edit your personal details

EmailFirst NameLast NameMobile/CellHome/DaytimeWorkGender

Male
Female
HometownPrimary CountryCorporate WebsiteI want to get marketing materials from Proactive InvestorsMore about yourselfTell us a little bit about you and your interestsOccupationPortfolio Size

No portfolio
€1 - €49,000
€50,000 - €99,000
€100,000 - €499,000
€500,000 - €1,000,000
+€1000,000
Interest(You can select more then one)
General Interest
Educational
Private Investor
Professional Investor
Institutional Investor
Hedge Fund Manager
Public Relations
Financial Services
Broker
Media / Press
 

Change your password

PasswordPassword Repeat 











×
Contact Support



 

Your email: *Problematic page url *Message * 
Verification code
  
Enter the code from above * 
 





























 

×

 
Advanced Search


Keyword  

Search by 

CHANNEL
SECTOR
MARKET
AUTHOR
 



Energy
Mining
Pharma & Biotech
Tech
In Focus
 

Aerospace
Aerospace & Defense
Agribusiness
Automobiles & Parts
Banks
Basic Materials
Beverages
Broadcasting & Entertainment 
Building Material & Fixtures
Business Support Services
Capital Goods
Chemicals
Cleantech and Renewable Energy
Clothing & Footwear
Computer Hardware
Computer Services
Construction & Materials
Consumer Finance
Consumer Services
Diamonds & Gemstones
Education
Electronic & Electrical Equipment
Energy
Engineering
Equity Instruments
ETF - Exchange-Traded Fund 
Exploration & Production
Financial
Financial Admin
Food & Beverages
Food & Drug Retailers
Forestry & Paper
Furnishings
Gambling
General Financials
General Industry
General Mining
General Mining - Coal
General Mining - Copper
General Mining - Diamonds & Gemstones
General Mining - Gold
General Mining - Iron Ore and Bauxite
General Mining - Lithium
General Mining - Moly, Chrome, Tungsten & Manganese
General Mining - Nickel and Cobalt
General Mining - Platinum Group Metals
General Mining - Potash and Phosphate
General Mining - Rare Earth Minerals
General Mining - Silver
General Mining - Uranium & Lithium
General Mining - Zinc, Lead and Tin
General Retailers
Gold Mining
Growth Companies
Health Care, Equipment & Services
Industrial Machinery
Industrial Metals
Industrial Suppliers
Insurance
Integrated Oil & Gas
Internet
Internet
Investment Funds & Companies
Investment Services
IT Hardware
Leisure
Manufacturing
Media & Publishing
Medical Cannabis
Mining
Mobile Communications
Multiutilities
Nonequity Investment Instruments
Oil & Gas
Oil & Gas Equipment & Services
Oil & Gas Exploration & Production
Other Industry News
Personal Products
Pharma & Biotech
Pharmaceuticals
Platinum & Precious Metals
Real Estate
Real Estate Holding & Development
Recreational Services
Renewable Energy
Restaurants, pubs
Semiconductors
Software & Computer Services
Specialty Chemicals
Specialty Finance
Specialty Retailers
Sports
Support Services
Tech
Technology Hardware & Equipment
Telecommunications Equipment
Telecoms
Telecoms services
Transportation
Travel Leisure
Travel, Leisure & Hospitality
Utilities
 

All UK Markets
All North American Markets
PRIVATE
AIM
OTCQB
PINK
TMP
AMEX
LSE
PLUS
ASX
TSX
JSE
NASDAQ
FRA
TSX-V
OTCBB
KRX
OTC
FFT
NYSE
XETRA
ISE
MCE
CSE
COLOMBO
NASDAQ OMX
OSL
GXG
GSX
NSX
NEX
OTCMKTS
EPA
SGX
Frankfurt Code 
NYSEMKT
ETR
HKG
AEX 
 

Ian Mclelland
Craig Ribton
Ian Lyall
Philip Whiterow
Sam Kiri
Ruth Gemmell
Andrew McCrea
John Phillips
John Harrington 
Deborah Bacal
Carrie Howes
Brian Keane
Peter Murray
Jamie Ashcroft
Giles Gwinnett
Northland Capital 
Deborah Sterescu
Charlotte Kan
Anwar Ali
Bevis Yeo
Mourad Haroutunian
Gordon Aldcorn
Alessandro Bruno 
Jane Sully
Jackie Steinitz
Steve Asfour
Natasha Barr 
Proactive Investors
John McGoldrick
SP Angel
HB Markets
Ransquawk
Fuller Treavy
Galvan
Trader Talk
Hybridan
Fox-Davies
Fat Prophets
Alistair Strang
Edison's weekly research summary
The Naked Trader
Keith Heddle
Michael Millar
Angus Warren 
Beaufort Securities
Markets At A Glance 
Sprott Group
Susan McKenzie
Charlotte Kan 
Leigh Bolton
Adam Sheldrake
Sophie Barrowman
Emma Milton
Northland Capital
IG Group
Malcolm Graham-Wood
Nick Huber
Nicola Brown
Andrew Neil
Shard Capital
Damon Heath
Gareth Burchell
Juliet Mann
Jon Hopkins
Accendo Markets 
Sarah Lowther
Greg Watson
Nigel Roberts
.
Fuller Treacy Money
Philip Waller 
Jonathan Jones
Alastair Ford
Glen Jones
Thomas Coleman
Stewart Dalby 
Eithne Treanor
RFC Ambrian
Ben Marlow
Richard Embrey
Ebiquity
Kieron Hodgson
Stefania Barbaglio
Sasha Sethi
Jeremy Naylor
Jamie Nimmo
Carrie White
George Matlock
Josh Allsopp 
Tom Howard
VSA Capital 
George Matlock 
Charles Breese 
Roger Lawson
Andrew Scott
Jonathon Narvey 
Jonathon Narvey
Angela Kean
Christine Feary
Andre Lamberti
Jeff Coote
Sergei Balashov
Brad Lemaire
Joyanta Acharjee
Olivia D'Orazio
Jon Mainwaring
Ross Louthean, Mineweb.net
Fiona MacDonald
Erin Sugar
Richard Badauskas
Metals Place
Kam Patel
Julie Crust
Chris Shaw
Dorothy Kosich
Stephen Feldman
Jon Hopkins 
Tip Tv
Renae Dyer 
The Naked Fund Manager 
Helaine Kang
Sam Catalano
Lionel Therond
Riccardo Lowi
Ed Stacey
James Dolman
Ed Birkin
Youssef Essaegh
David Eaton
Fahad Changazi
James Eginton
Andy Brown
Zak Mir 
Eugene Gallagher
Nishant Varma
Christian Schmidt
Huub Verschueren
Mark A. Smith
Siva Sithraputhran 
Rachel Middleton
Paula Middlehurst 
 










 
















 

HomeLON:IMERNS Press Releases








Immedia Group plc. RNS Release
Interim Results



        Share  



 Facebook





 Twitter
            


 Google+


 LinkedIn


 Email


 Print


 Download PDF version




7:00 AM 29 Sep 2016







 RNS Number : 1413L Immedia Group PLC 29 September 2016    29 September 2016   IMMEDIA GROUP PLC (AIM: IME) ("Immedia" or the "Group")   INTERIM RESULTS 2016   Immedia (AIM: IME), a supplier of multi-media content and digital solutions for leading brands and global businesses, announces its interim results for the six months ended 30 June 2016.    Key points:   ·      Total comprehensive loss reduced to £0.09 million (H1 2015: £0.14 million) on reduced revenue of £1.06 million, (H1 2015: £1.37 million)   ·      Further 12 month contract with BT signed in March for Reach 365, a 24/7 radio station for Openreach engineers delivered through Immedia's innovative mobile app   ·      Subway® contract signed in April making Subway® Radio available to franchisees in the UK and Republic of Ireland, France, Germany, The Netherlands, Finland and Sweden:  -  highly successful initial roll-out with over 1500 stores signed up in the first 10 weeks -  Subway® Radio subsequently made mandatory in UK and Ireland                                                ·      New senior management appointed within the business   ·      Proven offering with clear focus on new business development in line with strategy.   Post the period end   ·      Acquisition of AVC Immedia completed in September 2016, strengthening the Group's combined product and service offering, with new client opportunities in our target sectors   ·      Significant contract win announced with a major UK retailer   ·      Advanced discussions for new channel launches with two other major brands   Bruno Brookes, CEO of Immedia, said:   "We now have an impressive combination of digital services, supporting an even stronger range of multi-media audience engagement tools for clients in our primary target sectors of retail, workforce, sport and education. Following the acquisition of AVC Immedia, we are also developing an exciting new generation of services for a combined pipeline of prospects.    "Whilst the expiry of some long term contracts, such as Lloyds Bank, has affected the first half of the year, we expect revenue in the second half of the year to improve, even before the addition of AVC Immedia. As I have stated previously, enquiry levels in the existing Immedia business are strong, as they are in AVC Immedia, and the Board is confident that the outlook for the business is positive."   For further information please contact:       Immedia Group Plc Bruno Brookes - Chief Executive Officer   Tel:   +44 (0) 1635 556200     SPARK Advisory Partners Limited (NOMAD) Mark Brady/Neil Baldwin   Tel:  +44 (0) 203 368 3550     SI Capital Ltd (Broker) Nick Emerson/Andy Thacker   Tel:  +44 (0) 1483 413500     Hudson Sandler Catriona Valentine / Alex Clelland   Tel:  +44 (0) 207 796 4133       This announcement contains information which, prior to its disclosure, was inside information for the purposes of the Market Abuse Regulation.   About Immedia Group Plc - www.immediaplc.com   Immedia Group Plc is a multi-media content and digital solutions provider to global businesses and organisations, who are investing in internal and/or Brand communications. Our interactive audio - visual channels deliver original and relevant content, via Immedia's Dreamstream platform, to a client's workforce and its customer base. Each channel is supported with powerful data analytics tools, which monitor audience activity and provide data to enable us to enhance audience engagement.    The Group also creates original video content, 3D & 4D animation, app and web development, as well as supplying and installing Audio Visual equipment. Immedia's clients include, amongst others, HSBC, Subway Europe, Superdrug, BT Openreach, O2, FIFA, Shell and BP.       Financial Highlights             Restated             Unaudited  Half year to   30 June 2016    Unaudited  Half year to   30 June 2015    Audited  Year to  31 December 2015                       Revenue   £1,055,464   £1,373,657   £2,366,293                       EBITDA   £15,671   £116,418   £54,767                       Results from operating activities   £(14,513)   £96,035   £6,274                       (Loss)/profit before income tax   £(11,575)   £95,308   £5,379                       Income tax   -   -   £(100,060)                       (Loss)/profit for the period   £(11,575)   £95,308   £(94,681)                       Net fair value loss on available for sale assets   £(82,500)   £(239,700)   £(352,200)                                         Total comprehensive loss for the period   £(94,075)   £(144,392)   £(446,881)                       (Loss)/earnings per share - basic (pence)   (0.08)   0.69   (0.69)     (Loss)/earnings per share - diluted (pence)   (0.08)   0.68   (0.69)                       Cash and cash equivalents   £338,101   £526,438   £353,435                       Net cash   £338,101   £492,624   £344,664             CHIEF EXECUTIVE'S REVIEW   The financial results for the first half of 2016 reflect mixed fortunes of the Group. Whilst contracts with Lloyds Bank and Game expired we have since made excellent progress with our strategy to launch new channels to a broader client base within four strategic business sectors: retail, workforce, sport and education. We are at various stages of business development in all of these sectors.   As the digital landscape continues to evolve, brands and businesses are seeking to establish every opportunity to communicate with their audiences in the most cost effective and engaging way. As content is king and relevance is key, Immedia has evolved its delivery to spaces and places, together with rapid developments to its mobile offering. I firmly believe this to be one of our most innovative and exciting areas of growth.   Results   Revenue reduced to £1,055,464 (H1 2015: £1,373,657), a decrease of 23% on the corresponding period in 2015, generating EBITDA of £15,671 (H1 2015: £116,418). These reductions resulted from the expiration of our contracts with Game and Lloyds Banking Group (in June 2015) and a slower than anticipated conversion of our new business pipeline.   The Company has net cash of £0.34 million at the period end.   Immedia's investment in Audioboom Group plc, the social media platform business, (AIM: BOOM), showed significant fluctuations in value during the period.  In accordance with our IFRS accounting regime, a loss on revaluation of investments of £82,500 has been reported in the period (H1 2015: restated loss of £239,700).  Cumulatively, the Group remains in profit on its investment.   Operations   We have created a stronger and broader product and service offering over the last 18 months and our strategy is firmly fixed in the four key areas of business mentioned earlier.    We have recently appointed Steve King as COO to strengthen our operations in readiness for growth. Steve is a media executive with over 20 years of board level experience and a proven track record in the radio business.  Steve was formerly Regional Managing Director (North West and Midlands) of Bauer Media.   In March 2016, the Group successfully renewed its ground-breaking contract with BT Group plc for the supply of Reach 365, an interactive, real time, digital radio channel available to the 30,000 employees in its local network business, Openreach, using Immedia's mobile audio streaming platform.  This highly scalable white label streaming platform enables large, geographically dispersed companies to engage directly with their employees and customers, using dedicated audio content streamed directly to their buildings, mobile phones and other devices.   The Group's most notable achievement in H1 was the launch of SUBWAY® Radio.  In April we secured a major five-year contract to supply branded in-store music and marketing channels known as SUBWAY® Radio to franchisees in the UK and Republic of Ireland, France, Germany, The Netherlands, Finland and Sweden. The Group is also providing in-store equipment.  Immedia has designed and delivered country specific versions of SUBWAY® Radio. Each of these channels, delivered via Immedia's Dreamstream™ network, features a mixture of relevant music, branding and 'on-air' SUBWAY® marketing messages to tie in with national and regional campaigns.   SUBWAY® Radio has been adopted rapidly in a number of European territories. In the 10 weeks from launch to the end of H1, over 1500 stores were connected.  Following the highly successful rollout subscription to the service for franchisees in the UK and Ireland is now mandatory. Rollouts of separate channels continue in Germany, the Netherlands, Finland and Sweden with new territories in development.    Post-period end, we announced that our contract with Arcadia Group Ltd will expire in December 2016.   We have also announced this week that we have signed a significant three year contract with a major UK retailer, which commences next month. We believe that the combination of this new contract and the better than expected take-up by Subway franchisees and other strong pipeline prospects will more than offset losses in the period.   Post-period end   Acquisition   Earlier this month, we were delighted to announce the post period end acquisition of the business and certain assets of  AVC Media Enterprises Ltd and AVC Media Holdings Ltd (now AVC Immedia), based in Aberdeen, for a cash consideration of £200,000. AVC Immedia is a media and communications business and digital technology specialist, supplying a range of services that include audio visual solutions, video conferencing, event production/management, video and 3D animation, web and graphic design and App development. The business is active in many sectors but is particularly well known in oil & gas, sport and tourism. Its past and current clients include leading brands and global businesses such as FA, FIFA, Shell, BP, Aker, SKY and BT Sport.   AVC Immedia has already secured new contracts with FIFA since its acquisition and the Board looks forward to delivering further progress reports on this new addition to the Group.   Significant contract win   The Group was very pleased to announce the signing of a significant three year contract with a major UK retailer this week, which commences next month. We believe that the combination of this new contract and the better than expected take-up by Subway franchisees and other strong pipeline prospects will more than offset losses in the period.   We announced that our contract with Arcadia Group Ltd will expire in December 2016.   Outlook   Immedia is in advanced discussions with a number of significant UK retailers and organisations who are keen to develop branded communications channels, one of which we have signed this week. AVC Immedia is already contributing to the Group's revenue.  In addition to the recently announced FIFA contracts, it is working on a 3D animation project for New York based SAFWAY on a two year contract as well as other animation projects with Technip and Oceaneering. We are also working with TOTAL, William Grant & Sons, The Wood Group and Maersk on audio visual projects.    The Board anticipates that revenue from our existing business will be stronger in the second half of the year and this will be augmented by the addition of AVC Immedia.  We are managing costs carefully as we integrate the businesses to develop a combined offering to a wider range of both existing and prospective clients.    I believe that Immedia's new offering is "timely", as businesses and organisations actively seek to engage with key audiences using a broad range of digital content solutions. We have built an impressive portfolio of products and services which are benefitting new business development.  Given the success of Reach 365 and SUBWAY® Radio and the current pipeline, the Board is confident of delivering significant progress in the short to mid-term.   Bruno Brookes Chief Executive           Consolidated statement of profit or loss                         Restated                   Note   Unaudited Half year to 30 June 16 £        Unaudited Half year to 30 June 15 £        Audited Year ended 31 Dec 15 £                                    Revenue       1,055,464       1,373,657        2,366,293                                   Cost of sales       (528,074)       (639,001)       (1,119,619)                                   Gross profit       527,390       734,656       1,246,674                                   Administrative expenses       (541,903)       (638,621)       (1,240,400)                                   (Loss)/profit from operations       (14,513)       96,035       6,274                                   Finance income       3,444       5,832       11,481                                   Finance cost       (506)       (6,559)       (12,376)                                   (Loss)/profit before tax       (11,575)       95,308       5,379                                   Tax expense   4   -       -       (100,060)                                   (Loss)/profit for the period       (11,575)       95,308       (94,681)                                                                 (Loss)/earnings per share                             Basic (pence)    15   (0.08)p       0.69p       (0.69)p                                   Diluted (pence)   15   (0.08)p       0.68p       (0.69)p               Consolidated statement of profit or loss and other comprehensive income                       Restated                     Unaudited Half year to 30 June 16 £        Unaudited Half year to 30 June 15 £        Audited Year ended 31 Dec 15 £                                    (Loss)/profit for the period       (11,575)       95,308       (94,681)                                   Items that may be reclassified subsequently to profit or loss                                                           Net fair value loss on available for sale assets during the period       (82,500)       (239,700)       (352,200)                                   Total comprehensive loss for the period       (94,075)       (144,392)       (446,881)                                       Consolidated balance sheet                         Restated                   Note   Unaudited  as at  30 June 16    £        Unaudited  as at  30 June 15    £        Audited as at   31 Dec 15    £                                    Assets                             Non-current assets                             Property, plant and equipment   5   184,393       172,804       211,481     Intangible assets    6   201,045       202,787       201,694     Deferred tax assets       60,700       160,760       60,700     Available for sale assets   9   172,500       367,500       255,000     Total non-current assets       618,638       903,851       728,875                                   Current assets                             Inventories   7   54,147       97,101       89,621     Trade and other receivables   8   944,793       617,406       859,610     Prepayments       124,539       117,583       85,360     Cash and cash equivalents   10   338,101       526,438       353,435     Total current assets       1,461,580       1,358,528       1,388,026                                   Total assets       2,080,218       2,262,379       2,116,901                                                                 Equity                             Share capital    11   1,455,684       1,455,684       1,455,684     Share premium       3,586,541       3,586,541       3,586,541     Merger reserve       2,245,333       2,245,333       2,245,333     Share based payment reserve       4,578       4,578       4,578     Investment valuation reserve       82,500       277,500       165,000     Retained losses       (6,350,436)       (6,145,959)       (6,335,948)     Total equity       1,024,200       1,423,677       1,121,188                                   Liabilities                             Non-current liabilities                             Trade and other payables   14   34,449       -       103,347     Provisions       14,063       -       14,063     Total non-current liabilities       48,512       -       117,410                                   Current liabilities                             Borrowings   12   -       7,500       -     Finance leases   13   -       26,314       8,771     Trade and other payables   14   897,453       608,725       732,891     Deferred income       110,053       196,163       136,641     Total current liabilities       1,007,506       838,702       878,303     Total liabilities       1,056,018       838,702       995,713     Total equity and liabilities       2,080,218       2,262,379       2,116,901                                             Consolidated statement of changes in equity             Attributable to equity shareholders of the Company           Share capital     £    Share Premium account   £    Merger reserve     £    Share based payment reserve    £   Investment revaluation reserve £   Retained losses     £    Total equity     £                                        Total equity at 30 June 2016 (unaudited)                                                           Balance at 1 January 2016   1,455,684   3,586,541   2,245,333   4,578   165,000   (6,335,948)   1,121,188      Sale of EBT shares on exercise of share options   -   -   -   -   -   2,597   2,597     Purchase of own shares by EBT   -   -   -   -   -   (5,510)   (5,510)     Transactions with owners   -   -   -   -   -   (2,913)   (2,913)     Loss for the period   -   -   -   -   -   (11,575)   (11,575)     Other comprehensive income for the period:                         Net fair value loss on available for sale financial assets   -   -   -   -   (82,500)   -   (82,500)     Total comprehensive loss for the period   -   -   -   -   (82,500)   (11,575)   (94,075)     Balance at 30 June 2016   1,455,684   3,586,541   2,245,333   4,578   82,500   (6,350,436)   1,024,200                                                                           Total equity at 30 June 2015 (unaudited) (Restated)                                                           Balance at 1 January 2015   1,455,684   3,586,541   2,245,333   4,578   517,200   (6,241,267)   1,568,069      Profit for the period   -   -   -   -   -   95,308   95,308     Other comprehensive income for the period:                         Net fair value loss on available for sale financial assets     -     -     -     -     (239,700)     -     (239,700)     Total comprehensive loss for the period     -     -     -     -     (239,700)     95,308     (144,392)     Balance at 30 June 2015   1,455,684   3,586,541   2,245,333   4,578   277,500   (6,145,959)   1,423,677           Consolidated statement of changes in equity continued         Attributable to equity shareholders of the Company           Share capital     £    Share Premium account   £    Merger reserve     £    Share based payment reserve    £   Investment revaluation reserve £   Retained losses     £    Total equity     £      Total equity at 31 December 2015 (audited)                                                           Balance at 1 January 2015   1,455,684   3,586,541   2,245,333   4,578   517,200   (6,241,267)   1,568,069      Loss for the year   -   -   -   -   -   (94,681)   (94,681)     Other comprehensive income for the year:                         Net fair value loss on available for sale financial assets     -     -     -     -     (352,200)     -     (352,200)     Total comprehensive loss for the year     -     -     -     -     (352,200)     (94,681)     (446,881)     Balance at 31 December 2015   1,455,684   3,586,541   2,245,333   4,578   165,000   (6,335,948)   1,121,188                                             Consolidated statement of cash flows                         Restated                   Note   Unaudited  Half Year to  30 June 16 £        Unaudited  Half Year to  30 June 15  £        Audited Year ended  31 Dec 15  £                                    Cash flows from operating activities                             (Loss)/profit for the period before income tax       (11,575)       95,308       5,379     Adjustments for:                             Depreciation and amortisation charges       30,184       20,384       48,493     Finance income       (3,444)       (5,832)       (11,481)     Finance cost       506       6,559       12,376     (Increase)/decrease in trade and other receivables and prepayments         (124,362)         278,901         68,919     Decrease/(increase) in inventories       35,474       (20,578)       (13,098)     Increase/(decrease) in trade and other payables and deferred income         69,074         (29,322)         138,669     Increase in provisions       -       -       14,063     Net cash from operating activities       (4,143)       345,420       263,320                                   Taxation                             Taxation       -       -       -                                   Cash flows from investing activities                             Interest received       3,444       5,832       11,481     Acquisition of property, plant and equipment   5   (2,445)       (55,806)       (121,499)     Acquisition of intangible assets   6   -       (250)       (250)     Net cash from investing activities       999       (50,224)       (110,268)                                   Cash flows from financing activities                             Repayment of bank loan       -       (11,250)       (18,750)     Repayment of finance leases       (8,771)       (17,543)       (35,084)     Interest paid       (506)       (6,559)       (12,376)     Amounts repaid under invoice financing facility       -       (57,751)       (57,752)     Sale of EBT shares on exercise of share options       2,597       -       -     Purchase of own shares for EBT       (5,510)       -       -     Net cash from financing activities       (12,190)       (93,103)       (123,962)                                   Net (decrease)/increase in cash and cash equivalents         (15,334)         202,093         29,090                                   Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period       353,435       324,345       324,345                                     Cash and cash equivalents at end of period     10     338,101         526,438         353,435           Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements     1. Reporting entity   Immedia Group Plc (the "Company") is a company incorporated and domiciled in the United Kingdom.  The address of the Company's registered office and its principal place of business is 7-9 The Broadway, Newbury, Berkshire RG14 1AS.   The condensed consolidated interim financial statements of the Company as at and for the half year ended 30 June 2016 comprise the Company and its subsidiaries (together referred to as the "Group").  The financial information set out in this interim report does not constitute statutory accounts as defined in Section 434 of the Companies Act 2006. The Group's statutory financial statements for the year ended 31 December 2015 have been filed with the Registrar of Companies. The auditor's report on those financial statements was unqualified and did not contain a statement under Section 498(2) of the Companies Act 2006. The consolidated financial statements of the Group as at and for the year ended 31 December 2015 are available at http://www.immediaplc.com/plc/annual-reports/   The Group primarily is involved in marketing and communication services through music, radio and screen based media together with the supply, installation and maintenance of associated equipment.      2. Basis of preparation   These consolidated financial statements for the half year ended 30 June 2016 are unaudited.  They have been prepared and approved by the directors following the recognition and measurement principles of International Financial Reporting Standards as adopted by the EU ("Adopted IFRSs"); they do not include all of the information required for full annual financial statements, and should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements of the Group as at and for the year ended 31 December 2015. The unaudited financial statements for the comparative period of six months to 30 June 2015 have been restated to include the effect of restatements in the audited accounts to 31 December 2015. These included the reclassification of the investment in Audioboom Plc as available-for-sale, which resulted in the 2015 fair value losses being disclosed in the Consolidated Statement of Other Comprehensive Income.  The effect of the restatement has been to change the loss before tax in the Consolidated Statement of Profit or Loss for the six months to 30 June 2015 from £ (144,392) to a profit of £95,308 and to change the net fair value loss on available for sale assets in the Consolidated Statement of Profit or Loss and Other Comprehensive Income from £Nil to £(239,700). The total comprehensive income for the six months to 30 June 2015 remains unchanged at a loss of £(144,392). Earnings per share (eps) for the six months to 30 June 2015 have been restated following the removal from the calculation of the net fair value loss of £239,700 and are based on the after tax profit of £95,308. Basic eps is restated from (1.052) pence loss to 0.69 pence earnings and diluted eps from (1.052) pence loss to 0.68 pence earnings.  Other changes in presentation comprise the classification of available for sale assets with non-current assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Deferred taxation has been restated on a net basis and is classified with non-current assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. An investment valuation reserve has been included in Equity (see Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity).   On the basis of current financial projections prepared up to the end of 2017, recent news of new contracts and of contract renewals, continuing improvements in management of costs, and ongoing availability of facilities, the Directors are satisfied that the Group has adequate resources to continue in operation for the foreseeable future and consequently the financial statements have been prepared on the going concern basis.   The interim financial statements were approved by the Board of Directors on 28 September 2016.     Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     3. Significant accounting policies   The accounting policies set out in detail in note 3 of the Group's consolidated financial statements to 31 December 2015 have been applied consistently to these unaudited financial statements to 30 June 2016, including:   (a) Revenue Revenue represents the amounts receivable by the Group for the provision of its goods and services, excluding value added tax.  Revenue from production services comprise the broadcasting of live and as live radio programmes to customers' premises using appropriate technologies, together with the production of advertising content for use in those programmes. Revenue from these services is billed on time based subscriptions and recognised on the date of broadcast.  Revenue from equipment sales is recognised on the earlier of date of delivery and configuration, or when risk and rewards pass to the customer; revenue from content delivery and equipment maintenance services is billed on time based subscriptions and is recognised monthly on completion.   To the extent that invoices are raised to a different pattern than revenue recognition described above, appropriate adjustments are made through deferred and accrued income to account for revenue when the underlying service has been performed or goods have been transferred to the customer.   (b) Financial instruments: financial assets Investments other than investments in subsidiaries are classified as either held-for-trading or as available-for-sale at initial recognition and this designation is re-evaluated at each period end date. At the period end date all such investments are classified as available-for-sale. Available-for-sale investments are initially measured at fair value, which ordinarily equates to cost, including transaction costs. At subsequent reporting dates available-for-sale investments are measured at fair value or at cost where fair value is not readily measurable. Gains and losses arising from changes in fair value are recognised in other comprehensive income and taken to the investment revaluation reserve until the investment is disposed of or is determined to be impaired, at which time the accumulated fair value adjustments recognised in equity are included in the statement of profit or loss as 'gains and losses from investments'.       4. Income tax credit in the statement of profit or loss           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £     Current tax                         Current period   -       -       -                               Deferred tax expense                         Deferred tax   -       -       100,060                               Total tax expense in consolidated statement of profit or loss   -       -       100,060       The utilisation of historic tax losses and excess management charges is expected to eliminate all potential tax charges for the period to 30 June 2016 (in 2015 the deferred tax expense arose from the reduction in value of deferred tax assets following losses from financial assets available for sale during the year).    Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     5. Property, plant and equipment           Plant &   Fixtures &    Network   Total          equipment   fittings    equipment             £   £    £   £                            Cost                     At 1 January 2016   828,684   592,882   187,384   1,608,950     Additions   192   2,253   -   2,445                                                                                    At 30 June 2016   828,876   595,135   187,384   1,611,395                                                                                    Depreciation and impairment losses                     At 1 January 2016   810,141   399,944   187,384   1,397,469     Charge for period   3,434   26,099   -   29,533                                                                                   At 30 June 2016   813,575   426,043   187,384   1,427,002                                                                                   Carrying amounts                     Unaudited at 30 June 2016   15,301   169,092   -   184,393                                                                                    Audited at 31 December 2015   18,543   192,938   -   211,481                                                                                    Unaudited at 30 June 2015   21,947   150,857   -   172,804                                                                                      Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     6. Intangible assets           Customer   Content   Goodwill   Total           relationships   Delivery                 £   £   £   £                           Cost                     At 1 January 2016   566,880   51,385   1,173,310   1,791,575     Additions in period   -   -   -   -     At 30 June 2016   566,880   51,385   1,173,310   1,791,575                           Amortisation and impairment losses                     At 1 January 2016   566,880   49,001   974,000   1,589,881     Charge for period   -   649   -   649     At 30 June 2016   566,880   49,650   974,000   1,590,530                           Carrying amounts                     Unaudited at 30 June 2016   -   1,735   199,310   201,045                           Audited at 31 December 2015   -   2,384   199,310   201,694                           Unaudited at 30 June 2015   -   3,477   199,310   202,787                             There were no indications of impairment of intangible assets at 30 June 2016 and the annual impairment tests will be carried out at the year end.         7. Inventories           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Work in progress   29,101       19,090       25,831     Finished goods   25,046       78,011       63,790         54,147       97,101       89,621                       The inventory expense included in cost of sales in the consolidated statement of profit or loss was £104,490 (30 June 2015: £139,470; 31 December 2015: £38,837). Impairment charges for obsolete and slow moving inventories were £Nil (30 June 2015: £5,391; 31 December 2015: £4,896).   Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     8. Trade and other receivables           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Trade receivables (i)   828,787       443,628       518,694     Accrued contract income   115,006       131,528       339,916     Other debtors   1,000       1,000       1,000         944,793       576,156       859,610     At 30 June 2016 trade receivables are shown after a provision for impairment of £3,580 (30 June 2015: £3,580; 31 December 2015: £3,580) arising from slow moving debts and disputed charges. (i) At 30 June 2016 the total of trade receivables past due, net of provision for impairment, was as follows:         Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Up to 3 months past due   66,350       58,782       109,013     Over 3 months past due (i)   399,386       72,573       176,860     (i) Cash collections for debts over 3 months past due improved in the third quarter of 2016.     9. Other short term financial assets   In March 2014 the Group invested £90,000 in the purchase of 6,000,000 shares in Audioboom Group plc, an AIM-quoted audio social media platform, as part of the Group's strategy to broaden its digital marketing and communications services.  The investment has been designated as available-for-sale with fair value changes recognised in other comprehensive income (see note 3(b) above). At 30 June 2016 the fair value of the investment was £172,500 with a current period fair value loss of £82,500 recognised in other comprehensive income (30 June 2015 fair value £367,500 with fair value loss of £239,700 recognised in other comprehensive income; 31 December 2015 fair value £255,000 with fair value loss of £352,200 recognised in other comprehensive income). As at the date of approval of this report, the investment represents c.1.12% of Audioboom Group plc's shares in issue and has a fair value of £150,000.       Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     10. Cash and cash equivalents           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Bank balances   5,634       66,930       11,627     Call deposits   332,467       454,078       341,808     Credit balance on invoice finance account   -       5,430       -     Cash and cash equivalents   338,101       526,438       353,435       Cash and cash equivalents comprise cash balances and short-term call deposits.     11. Share Capital           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Authorised                         36,000,000 Ordinary shares of 10 pence each   3,600,000       3,600,000       3,600,000                               Allotted, called up and fully paid                         14,556,844 Ordinary shares of 10 pence each   1,455,684       1,455,684       1,455,684                                 There are no restrictions on the transfer of shares in Immedia Group Plc. All shares carry equal voting rights.     12. Borrowings           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Current                         Bank loan (secured) (i)   -       7,500       -                                 (i) In 2015 a two-year loan arranged with HSBC Bank Plc to part finance the conversion of ground floor space into offices in the Newbury studios building was fully repaid. The loan was secured by floating charge on the assets of Immedia Broadcast Limited. (ii) The Group has an invoice financing facility with HSBC Invoice Financing (UK) Limited under which advances up to £250,000 are secured by debenture on Immedia Broadcast Limited's assets. There were no borrowings under this facility at 30 June 2016 (30 June and 31 December 2015: £nil).       Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     13. Finance lease arrangements   Certain equipment supplied to customers under contract was financed under finance lease arrangements with Aurora Leasing Limited under which advances were secured by debenture on Immedia Broadcast Limited's assets. The lease agreement was fully repaid at the end of its three-year term in March 2016. The equipment supplied was recognised as a sale in accordance with the Group's revenue recognition accounting policy as detailed in note 3(a) above; there are therefore no assets held under finance lease within Property, plant and equipment (note 5).   Future minimum finance lease payments were as follows:         Falling due:   Within 1 year         £               Unaudited at 30 June 2016         Net present values   -                              Audited at 31 December 2015         Net present values   8,771                              Unaudited at 30 June 2015         Net present values   26,314                                The lease agreement included fixed payments and a purchase option which was exercised at the end of the three-year lease term. The agreement was non-cancellable and did not contain any further restrictions.     Notes to the condensed consolidated interim financial statements continued     14. Trade and other payables           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 £       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 £       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 £                               Current                         Trade payables (i)   412,450       142,713       231,507     Other taxation & social security   101,680       123,457       83,576     Non-trade payables and accrued expenses (ii)   383,323       342,555       417,808         897,453       608,725       732,891                               Falling due after more than one year                         Trade payables   34,449       -       103,347                               (i)  At 30 June 2016 there were Euro denominated liabilities totalling €330 (30 June 2015: €670; 31 December 2015: €nil).  (ii) Included within Non-trade payables and accrued expenses are uninvoiced charges for servicing, maintenance and licensing costs for the Group's music and radio networks, plus accruals for legal and professional fees.     15. Earnings per share           Unaudited as at 30 June 16 Number       Unaudited as at 30 June 15 Number       Audited as at 31 Dec 15 Number                               Weighted average number of shares in issue   14,556,844        14,556,844        14,556,844      Less weighted average number of own shares   (832,374)       (832,374)       (832,374)     Weighted average number of shares in issue for basic earnings per share   13,724,470       13,724,470       13,724,470          The basic and diluted earnings per share are calculated using the after tax loss attributable to equity shareholders for the financial period of £11,575 (30 June 2015: restated profit £95,308; 31 December 2015: loss £94,681) divided by the weighted average number of Ordinary shares in issue in each of the relevant periods: 30 June 2016: 13,724,470 shares (30 June and 31 December 2015: 13,724,470 shares).  For the period to 30 June 2016 and the year to 31 December 2015, and in accordance with IAS 33, the diluted loss per share is stated as the same amount as basic as there is no dilutive effect.   The weighted number of shares used for the diluted earnings per share is calculated after reflecting the outstanding share options at the period end.           In accordance with Rule 26 of the AIM Rules for Companies, this interim financial statement will be available on the company's website at www.immediaplc.com/plc/annual-reports/  This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange  END  IR AKFDPOBKDQCB~~>                









                    Immedia Group plc. Timeline
                





Newswire 

April 11 2017

Immedia out of tune as it swings to a loss









Newswire 

September 27 2016

Immedia on song again as it clinches retail deal 









Newswire 

August 19 2016

Immedia's Subway radio taking off









Newswire 

April 21 2016

Immedia Group shares fade as net profit falls









Newswire 

April 18 2016

Immedia Group shares up as it's set for SUBWAY roll-out









Newswire 

November 14 2014

Traders tune in as Immedia gets O2 gig









Newswire 

September 08 2009

Immedia Group extends IKEA in-store radio contract and narrows losses in first half




View All








 RSS
 Portfolio

 Follow

									
		Only registred members can create thier own customized alerts. Register or Log in 
Help 












	Only registered members can add into watchlist. Register or Log in


Immedia Group plc.
 View full company profile


	Immedia Group plc, formerly Immedia Broadcasting Plc, is a United Kingdom-based holding company. The Company’s subsidiaries include Immedia Broadcast Limited and Cube Music Limited. The principal activities of the Company’s subsidiaries are that of marketing...
Read more



	Immedia Group plc, formerly Immedia Broadcasting Plc, is a United Kingdom-based holding company. The Company’s subsidiaries include Immedia Broadcast Limited and Cube Music Limited. The principal activities of the Company’s subsidiaries are that of marketing services. Immedia’s marketing services consist of bespoke radio and audio visual programming, music and visual content and associated equipment installation to the retail industry. Its clients are predominantly blue chip businesses who use the Company’s marketing services to communicate their brand both to their customers and to their staff.
Hide text








Market:
AIM			


EPIC:
IME


Market Cap:
3.64M


Latest Price:
25.00p 
											(0,00%)


52-week H/L:
47.00p / 21.25p


Sector: 
Media & Publishing








Immedia Group plc.








1day


1year















Loading charts
















Loading charts


























                Immedia Group plc. RNS announcements
            
 

2017-05-25  Result of Annual General Meeting2017-05-15  Non Regulatory - AVC Immedia at FIFA U20 World Cup2017-04-28  Annual Report and Accounts and Notice of AGM2016-11-15  Director/PDMR Shareholding2016-11-09  Further re new client contract2016-09-29  Interim Results2016-09-27  Significant new contract win2016-09-07  Acquisition2016-08-19  Trading Update2016-07-26  Board Change

View all announcements






Proactive Investors Recommended

Cello Group - More to this marketing services specialist than meets the eye 
Growth Acceleration Programme to drive future progress for marketing analytics firm Ebiquity
Lingo Media looking to be top of the class in 2017










 



















































International:
NA
AU
DE
CN



Our Company
Term & Conditions
The Team
Contact us
Newsletter
Sitemap
Cookies
Work for us



Partners:



























  






×
Login



 
Email Password 



Sign in


Did you forget your password? Click here for recovery





Or login using...























